Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF51.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1640SS (1) 91 th/ns S.F. 51 Section 1. Section 321.11, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section to the 3 contrary, the department shall not release personal information 4 to a person, other than to an officer or employee of a law 5 enforcement agency within this state , an employee of a federal 6 or state agency within this state or political subdivision 7 of this state in the performance of the employeeâs official 8 duties, a contract employee of the department of inspections, 9 appeals, and licensing in the conduct of an investigation, or 10 a licensed private investigation agency within this state or 11 a licensed security service within this state or a licensed 12 employee of either, if the information is requested by the 13 presentation of a registration plate number. In addition, an 14 officer or employee of a law enforcement agency may release 15 the name, address, and telephone number of a motor vehicle 16 registrant to a person requesting the information by the 17 presentation of a registration plate number if the officer 18 or employee of the law enforcement agency believes that the 19 release of the information is necessary in the performance of 20 the officerâs or employeeâs duties ; however, an officer or 21 employee of a law enforcement agency shall not release personal 22 information of a person issued a driverâs license by the 23 department to an out-of-state person or agency if the release 24 of personal information could be used to initiate a proceeding, 25 issue a fine, or enforce any other penalty resulting from an 26 alleged traffic violation, unless ordered to do so by a court, 27 or unless the person whose personal information is requested 28 has provided express written consent allowing the disclosure of 29 the personâs personal information . 30